Hawaii statutes.
§189-42 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Department" means the department of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Director" means the director of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"National Marine Fisheries Service"
means Financial Assistance Division, National Marine Fisheries Service,
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, United States Department of
Commerce.

"SBA" means the Federal Small
Business Administration.

"Small fishing vessel" means any
vessel under five net tons designed to be used in catching fish, processing, or
transporting fish loaded on the high seas that derives at least fifty-one per
cent of that vessel's gross annual income from commercial (as opposed to
recreational) operations, or any vessel outfitted for such activity. [L 1975, c
167, §8; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8]

Note

"Financial Assistance Division", National Marine
Fisheries Service, now known as "Financial Services Division".

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next